Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 12 Partnerships

7-12-1.
Provisions in partnership agreements deemed nontestamentary.

No partnership agreement in writing, or agreement in writing between copartners, either previously or subsequently entered into, is deemed testamentary in character, or for that reason invalid or unenforceable, because the agreement contains a provision: (1) regulating, in the event of the death of any of the partners, the transfer, distribution, or other disposition of the assets of the partnership, or any of them, to or among the surviving partners or any of them, or their successors, or the estate of the deceased partner; or (2) regulating, in the event of death, the use of the firm name by the surviving partners, or their successors, or any of them; or (3) regulating the destination, distribution, or other disposition of the proceeds of any policy or policies of insurance upon the life of any partner; nor is any provision contained in any partnership agreement or in any agreement between copartners testamentary in character or for that reason invalid or unenforceable; provided, however, that this section shall not be construed to affect the rights of the heirs, next of kin, devisees or creditors of a partner who has deceased prior to March 10, 1932.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 212, § 10; P.L. 1932, ch. 1862, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 428, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

7-12-1

.

7-12-2.
Death of partner — Statement delivered to administrator or executor.

In case of the death of any person who was at the time of his or her decease a member of any copartnership, either general or limited, the surviving partner shall, upon the demand in writing of the administrator or executor of the deceased copartner, and within ten (10) days subsequently, make out and deliver to the administrator or executor a detailed statement of the assets and liabilities of the copartners as they existed at the time of the decease of the copartner, which statement shall be verified by the oath of the surviving copartner.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 156, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 185, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 212, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 428, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

7-12-2

.

7-12-3.
Examination of books and property by representative of deceased partner.

The administrator or executor may enter upon the premises and examine the books and affairs of the copartnership and take an inventory of the personal property in which his or her intestate or testate may have had an interest at the time of his or her decease.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 156, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 185, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 212, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 428, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

7-12-3

.

7-12-4.
Separate composition with creditors on dissolution of partnership.

Whenever any copartnership is dissolved, any person who was embraced in the copartnership may make a separate composition or compromise with any one of or all the creditors of the copartnership.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 156, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 185, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 212, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 428, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

7-12-4

.

7-12-5.
Separate composition as full discharge of partner.

A composition or compromise is a full and effectual discharge to the debtor making the composition or compromise, of the whole of the debt, and is taken and considered in reference to the other copartners as actual payment of the debtor’s proportion of the debt, whether the full amount of his or her proportion of the debt is actually paid or not.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 156, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 185, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 212, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 428, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

7-12-5

.

7-12-6.
Payment by partner in excess of his or her proportion.

In case an amount exceeding his or her proportion is actually paid, it is taken and considered as payment of the amount of debt actually paid.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 156, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 185, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 212, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 428, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

7-12-6

.

7-12-7.
Insolvency or absconding of partner.

A composition or compromise in no way affects the right of the other copartners or any of them to call on the person making the compromise for any sum beyond the person’s original portion of the debt, if in consequence of the insolvency, inability to pay or absconding of any one of the copartners, the person so compromising becomes liable to pay more than his or her proportion of the debt.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 156, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 185, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 212, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 428, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

7-12-7

.

7-12-8.
Memorandum exonerating partner on separate composition.

Every debtor making a composition or compromise takes from the creditor with whom he or she may make the composition or compromise a note or memorandum in writing, exonerating him or her from all individual liability incurred by reason of the connection with the copartnership. The note or memorandum may be given in evidence by the debtor under the general issue, in bar of the creditor’s right of recovery against him or her.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 156, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 185, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 212, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 428, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

7-12-8

.

7-12-9.
Partners not discharged by separate composition — Defenses to creditor’s action.

A composition or compromise is not to be so construed as to discharge the other copartners, except as provided in §§

7-12-5

and

7-12-6

; nor does it impair the right of the creditor to proceed against the members of the copartnership who have not been discharged. The members of the partnership so proceeded against are permitted to set off any demand against the creditor that could have been set off had the suit been against all the individuals composing the firm. They may avail themselves of any defense that would have been available had not this chapter been passed, except that they shall not set up the discharge of one individual as a discharge of all the other copartners, unless it appears that all were intended to be discharged.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 156, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 185, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 212, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 428, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

7-12-9

.

7-12-10.
Application to joint debtors.

The provisions of §§

7-12-4

—

7-12-9

in reference to copartners extend to joint debtors who may individually compound or compromise for their joint indebtedness, with the like effect to creditors and to joint debtors of the person compromising as is provided in this section in reference to copartners.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 156, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 185, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 212, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 428, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

7-12-10

.

7-12-11.
Limited partnership law unaffected.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be deemed or taken to affect any of the provisions of chapter 13 of this title, entitled “Limited Partnerships”.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 428, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

7-12-11

.

7-12-12.
Short title. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Sections

7-12-12

—

7-12-55

may be cited as the “Uniform Partnership Act”.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 1.

7-12-12.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-13.
Definitions. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

In §§

7-12-12

—

7-12-59

:

“Bankrupt” includes bankrupt under title 11 of the United States Code (Bankruptcy) or insolvent under any state insolvent act.

“Business” includes every trade, occupation, or profession.

“Conveyance” includes every assignment, lease, mortgage, or encumbrance.

“Court” includes every court and judge having jurisdiction in the case.

“Foreign registered limited-liability partnership” means a registered limited-liability partnership or a limited-liability partnership formed pursuant to an agreement governed by the laws of another jurisdiction and registered under the laws of that jurisdiction.

“Person” includes individuals, partnerships, corporations, and other associations.

“Real property” includes land and any interest or estate in land.

“Registered limited-liability partnership” means a partnership formed pursuant to an agreement governed by the laws of this state, registered under §

7-12-56

and in compliance with §

7-12-58

.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 1.

7-12-13.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 2; P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-14.
Interpretation of knowledge and notice. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A person has “knowledge” of a fact within the meaning of §§

7-12-12

—

7-12-55

not only when he or she has actual knowledge of it, but also when he or she has knowledge of any other facts that in the circumstances show bad faith.

A person has “notice” of a fact within the meaning of §§

7-12-12

—

7-12-55

when the person who claims the benefit of the notice:

States the fact to the person; or

Delivers through the mail, or by other means of communication, a written statement of the fact to the person or to a proper person at his or her place of business or residence.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 3.

7-12-14.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 3; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-15.
Rules of construction. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The rule that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed has no application to §§

7-12-12

—

7-12-55

.

The law of estoppel applies under §§

7-12-12

—

7-12-55

.

The law of agency applies under §§

7-12-12

—

7-12-55

.

Sections

7-12-12

—

7-12-55

shall be so interpreted and construed as to effect their general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact them.

Sections

7-12-12

—

7-12-55

shall not be construed so as to impair the obligations of any contract existing on October 1, 1957, nor to affect any action or proceedings or right accrued before October 1, 1957.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 4.

7-12-15.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 4; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-16.
Rules for cases not provided for. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

In any case not provided for in §§

7-12-12

—

7-12-55

, the rules of law and equity, including the law merchant, govern.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 5.

7-12-16.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 5; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-17.
Partnership defined. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership is an association of two (2) or more persons to carry on as co-owners a business for profit, and includes a registered limited-liability partnership.

Any association formed under any other statute of this state, or any statute adopted by authority, other than the authority of the state, is not a partnership under §§

7-12-12

—

7-12-59

, unless the association would have been a partnership in this state prior to May 6, 1957; but §§

7-12-12

—

7-12-59

apply to limited partnerships except insofar as the statutes relating to partnerships are inconsistent with these provisions.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 235, § 1.

7-12-17.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 6; P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 235, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-18.
Rules for determining the existence of a partnership. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

In determining whether a partnership exists, these rules apply:

Except as provided by §

7-12-27

, persons who are not partners as to each other are not partners as to third persons.

Joint tenancy, tenancy in common, tenancy by the entireties, joint property, common property, or part ownership does not of itself establish a partnership, whether the co-owners do or do not share any profits made by the use of the property.

The sharing of gross returns does not of itself establish a partnership, whether or not the persons sharing them have a joint or common right or interest in any property from which the returns are derived.

The receipt by a person of a share of the profits of a business is prima facie evidence that he or she is a partner in the business, but no such inference is drawn if profits were received in payment:

As a debt by installments or otherwise;

As wages of an employee or rent to a landlord;

As an annuity to a widow or representative of a deceased partner;

As interest on a loan, though the amount of payment vary with the profits of the business;

As the consideration for the sale of a good will of a business or other property by installments or otherwise.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 7.

Partnership Not Found.

No partnership existed between a professional show owner and producer and a builders’ association, even though the show owner and producer’s predecessors in interest had produced home shows for the builders’ association in Rhode Island for more than 20 years where, inter alia, (1) the agreement between the parties was not denoted as a “partnership agreement,” (2) the agreement prescribed a fixed, albeit renewable, term, (3) rather than undertake to share operating costs with the builders’ association, the show owner and producer not only agreed to advance all monies required to produce the shows, but to indemnify the builders’ association for all show-related losses as well, and (4) the show owner and producer was responsible for the lion’s share of the management decisions. Southex Exhibitions, Inc. v. R.I. Builders Ass'n, 279 F.3d 94, 2002 U.S. App. LEXIS 1997 (1st Cir. 2002).

7-12-18.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 7; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-19.
Partnership property. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

All property originally brought into the partnership stock or subsequently acquired by purchase or otherwise, on account of the partnership, is partnership property.

Unless the contrary intention appears, property acquired with partnership funds is partnership property.

Any estate in real property may be acquired in the partnership name. Title so acquired can be conveyed only in the partnership name.

A conveyance to a partnership in the partnership name, though without words of inheritance, passes the entire estate of the grantor unless a contrary intent appears.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 8.

7-12-19.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 8; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-20.
Partner agent of partnership as to partnership business. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Every partner is an agent of the partnership for the purpose of its business, and the act of every partner, including the execution in the partnership name of any instrument, for apparently carrying on in the usual way the business of the partnership of which he or she is a member, binds the partnership, unless the partner so acting has in fact no authority to act for the partnership in the particular matter, and the person with whom he or she is dealing has knowledge of the fact that he or she has no authority.

An act of a partner that is not apparently for the carrying on of the business of the partnership in the usual way does not bind the partnership unless authorized by the other partners.

Unless authorized by the other partners or unless they have abandoned the business, one or more but less than all the partners have no authority to:

Assign the partnership property in trust for creditors or on the assignee’s promise to pay the debts of the partnership;

Dispose of the good will of the business;

Do any other act that would make it impossible to carry on the ordinary business of a partnership;

Confess a judgment;

Submit a partnership claim or liability to arbitration or reference.

No act of a partner in contravention of a restriction on authority shall bind the partnership to persons having knowledge of the restriction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 9.

7-12-20.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 9; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-21.
Conveyance of real property of the partnership. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Where title to real property is in the partnership name, any partner may convey title to the property by a conveyance executed in the partnership name; but the partnership may recover the property unless the partner’s act binds the partnership under the provisions of §

7-12-20(a)

, or unless the property has been conveyed by the grantee or a person claiming through the grantee to a holder for value without knowledge that the partner, in making the conveyance, has exceeded his or her authority.

Where title to real property is in the name of the partnership, a conveyance executed by a partner, in his or her own name, passes the equitable interest of the partnership, provided the act is one within the authority of the partner under the provisions of §

7-12-20(a)

.

Where title to real property is in the name of one or more but not all the partners, and the record does not disclose the right of the partnership, the partners in whose name the title stands may convey title to the property, but the partnership may recover the property if the partners’ act does not bind the partnership under the provisions of §

7-12-20(a)

unless the purchaser or his or her assignee, is a holder for value, without knowledge.

Where the title to real property is in the name of one or more or all of the partners, or in a third person in trust for the partnership, a conveyance executed by a partner in the partnership name, or in his or her own name, passes the equitable interest of the partnership, provided the act is one within the authority of the partner under the provision of §

7-12-20(a)

.

Where the title to real property is in the names of all the partners a conveyance executed by all the partners passes all their rights in the property.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 10.

7-12-21.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 10; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-22.
Partnership bound by admission of partner. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

An admission or representation made by any partner concerning partnership affairs within the scope of his or her authority as conferred by §§

7-12-12

—

7-12-55

is evidence against the partnership.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 11.

7-12-22.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 11; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-23.
Partnership charged with knowledge of or notice to partner. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Notice to any partner of any matter relating to partnership affairs, and the knowledge of the partners acting in the particular matter, acquired while a partner or then present to his or her mind, and the knowledge of any other partner who reasonably could and should have communicated it to the acting partner, operate as notice to or knowledge of the partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of that partner.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 12.

Partner as Both Buyer and Seller in Transaction.

Individual who is a partner in both the selling and buying entities involved in the sale of an apartment building does not commit “fraud” upon his partners in the buying entity, since his partners in the buying entity know that he is involved on both sides of the transactions. 850 Aquidneck Ave. Assocs. v. Aquidneck Court Assocs. (In re DiMartino), 108 B.R. 394, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 14897 (D.R.I. 1989).

7-12-23.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 12; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-24.
Partnership bound by partner’s wrongful act. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Where, by any wrongful act or omission of any partner acting in the ordinary course of the business of the partnership or with the authority of his or her copartners, loss or injury is caused to any person, not being a partner in the partnership, or any penalty is incurred, the partnership is liable for the loss, injury, or penalty to the same extent as the partner acting or omitting to act.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 13.

7-12-24.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 13; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-25.
Partnership bound by partner’s breach of trust. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The partnership is bound to make good the loss:

Where one partner acting within the scope of his or her apparent authority receives money or property of a third person and misapplies it; and

Where the partnership in the course of its business receives money or property of a third person and the money or property so received is misapplied by any partner while it is in the custody of the partnership.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 14.

7-12-25.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 14; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-26.
Nature of partner’s liability. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

All partners are liable, except as provided in subsection (b):

Jointly and severally for everything chargeable to the partnership under §§

7-12-24

and

7-12-25

.

Jointly for all other debts and obligations of the partnership; but any partner may enter into a separate obligation to perform a partnership contract.

Subject to subsection (c), a partner in a registered limited-liability partnership is not liable, directly or indirectly (including by way of indemnification, contribution, assessment or otherwise), for debts, obligations, and liabilities of, or chargeable to, the partnership whether in tort, contract, or otherwise, arising while the partnership is a registered limited-liability partnership.

Subsection (b) does not affect the individual liability of a partner in a registered limited-liability partnership for his or her own negligence, wrongful acts or misconduct, or that of any person under that partner’s direct supervision and control other than in an administrative capacity.

A partner in a registered limited-liability partnership is not a proper party in his or her individual capacity to a proceeding by or against a registered limited-liability partnership, the object of which is to recover damages or enforce the obligations of the registered limited-liability partnership, unless the partner is personally liable under subsection (c).

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, the personal liability of a partner in a limited-liability partnership engaged in the rendering of professional services is not less than or greater than the personal liability of a shareholder of a professional corporation organized under chapter 5.1 of this title engaged in the rendering of the same professional services.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 15; P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 235, § 1.

7-12-26.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 15; P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 235, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-27.
Partner by estoppel. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

When a person, by words spoken or written or by conduct, represents himself or herself, or consents to another representing him or her to any one, as a partner in an existing partnership or with one or more persons not actual partners, he or she is liable to any person to whom the representation has been made, who has, on the faith of the representation, given credit to the actual or apparent partnership, and if he or she has made a representation or consented to its being made in a public manner, he or she is liable to the person, whether the representation has or has not been made or communicated to the person giving credit by or with the knowledge of the apparent partner making the representation or consenting to its being made.

When a partnership liability results, he or she is liable as though he or she were an actual member of the partnership.

When no partnership liability results, he or she is liable jointly with the other persons, if any, so consenting to the contract or representation as to incur liability, otherwise separately.

When a person is represented to be a partner in an existing partnership, or with one or more persons not actual partners, he or she is an agent of the persons consenting to the representation to bind them to the same extent and in the same manner as though he or she were a partner in fact, with respect to persons who rely on the representation. Where all the members of the existing partnership consent to the representation, a partnership act or obligation results; but in all other cases it is the joint act or obligation of the person acting and the persons consenting to the representation.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 16.

7-12-27.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 16; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-28.
Liability of incoming partner. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A person admitted as a partner into an existing partnership is liable for all the obligations of the partnership arising before his or her admission as though he or she had been a partner when the obligations were incurred, except that this liability is satisfied only out of partnership property.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 17.

7-12-28.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 17; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-29.
Rules determining rights and duties of partners. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The rights and duties of the partners in relation to the partnership are determined, subject to any agreement between them, by the following rules:

Each partner is repaid his or her contributions, whether by way of capital or advances to the partnership property, and shares equally in the profits and surplus remaining after all liabilities, including those to partners, are satisfied; and except as provided in §

7-12-26(b)

, each partner must contribute toward the losses, whether of capital or otherwise, sustained by the partnership according to his or her share in the profits.

The partnership must indemnify every partner in respect of payments made and personal liabilities reasonably incurred by him or her in the ordinary and proper conduct of its business, or for the preservation of its business or property.

A partner, who in aid of the partnership makes any payment or advance beyond the amount of capital that he or she agreed to contribute, is paid interest from the date of the payment or advance.

A partner receives interest on the capital contributed by him or her only from the date when repayment should be made.

All partners have equal rights in the management and conduct of the partnership business.

No partner is entitled to remuneration for acting in the partnership business, except that a surviving partner is entitled to reasonable compensation for his or her services in winding up the partnership affairs.

No person can become a member of a partnership without the consent of all the partners.

Any difference arising as to ordinary matters connected with the partnership business may be decided by a majority of the partners; but no act in contravention of any agreement between the partners may be done rightfully without the consent of all the partners.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 18; P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 1.

7-12-29.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 18; P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 1; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-30.
Partnership books. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The partnership books are kept, subject to any agreement between the partners, at the principal place of business of the partnership, and every partner shall at all times have access to and may inspect and copy any of them.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 19.

7-12-30.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 19; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-31.
Duty of partners to render information. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Partners shall render on demand true and full information of all things affecting the partnership to any partner or the legal representative of any deceased partner or partner under legal disability.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 20.

7-12-31.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 20; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-31.1.
Nature of business.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a registered limited-liability partnership or a foreign registered limited-liability partnership may conduct any lawful business in this state.

A registered limited-liability partnership or a foreign registered limited-liability partnership may render professional services, as defined in §

7-5.1-2(2)

, as and to the extent permitted under law or rules and regulations of the applicable regulatory agency or agencies, as defined in §

7-5.1-2(3)

. Each regulatory agency as so defined is authorized to adopt, subject to applicable law, rules and regulations regarding a domestic and foreign limited-liability partnership rendering professional services. The rules and regulations shall not be inconsistent with law or rules or regulations regarding the rendering of professional services through a professional corporation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 270, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 205, § 1.

7-12-32.
Partner accountable as a fiduciary. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Every partner must account to the partnership for any benefit, and hold as trustee for it any profits derived by him or her without the consent of the other partners from any transaction connected with the formation, conduct, or liquidation of the partnership or from any use by him or her of its property.

This section applies also to the representatives of a deceased partner engaged in the liquidation of the affairs of the partnership as the personal representatives of the last surviving partner.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 21.

7-12-32.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 21; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-33.
Right to an account. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

Any partner has the right to a formal account as to partnership affairs:

If he or she is wrongfully excluded from the partnership business or possession of its property by his or her copartners.

If the right exists under the terms of any agreement.

As provided by §

7-12-32

.

Whenever other circumstances render it just and reasonable.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 22.

7-12-33.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 22; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-34.
Continuation of partnership beyond fixed term. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

When a partnership for a fixed term or particular undertaking is continued after the termination of the term or particular undertaking without any express agreement, the rights and duties of the partners remain the same as they were at the termination, insofar as is consistent with a partnership at will.

A continuation of the business by the partners or those of them who habitually acted in the partnership during the term, without any settlement or liquidation of the partnership affairs, is prima facie evidence of a continuation of the partnership.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 23.

7-12-34.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 23; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-35.
Extent of property rights of a partner. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

The property rights of a partner are:

His or her rights in specific partnership property;

His or her interest in the partnership; and

His or her rights to participate in the management.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 24.

7-12-35.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 24; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-36.
Nature of a partner’s right in specific partnership property. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A partner is co-owner with his or her partners of specific partnership property holding as a tenant in partnership.

The incidents of this tenancy are such that:

A partner, subject to the provisions of §§

7-12-12

—

7-12-55

and to any agreement between the partners, has an equal right with his or her partners to possess specific partnership property for partnership purposes; but he or she has no right to possess the property for any other purpose without the consent of his or her partners.

A partner’s right in specific partnership property is not assignable, except in connection with the assignment of rights of all the partners in the same property.

A partner’s right in specific partnership property is not subject to attachment or execution, except on a claim against the partnership. When partnership property is attached for a partnership debt, the partners, or any of them, or the representatives of a deceased partner, cannot claim any right under the exemption laws.

On the death of a partner, his or her right in specific partnership property vests in the surviving partner or partners, except where the deceased was the last surviving partner, when his or her right in the property vests in his or her legal representative. The surviving partner, or partners, or the legal representative of the last surviving partner, has no right to possess the partnership property for any but a partnership purpose.

A partner’s right in specific partnership property is not subject to dower, curtesy, or allowances to widows, heirs, or next of kin.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 25.

7-12-36.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 25; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-37.
Nature of partner’s interest in the partnership. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A partner’s interest in the partnership is his or her share of the profits and surplus, and his or her share of the profits and surplus is personal property.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 26.

7-12-37.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 26; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-38.
Assignment of partner’s interest. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

A conveyance by a partner of his or her interest in the partnership does not of itself dissolve the partnership, nor, as against the other partners in the absence of agreement, entitle the assignee, during the continuance of the partnership, to interfere in the management or administration of the partnership business or affairs, to require any information or account of partnership transactions, or to inspect the partnership book. It merely entitles the assignee to receive, in accordance with his or her contract, the profits to which the assigning partner would otherwise be entitled.

In case of a dissolution of the partnership, the assignee is entitled to receive his or her assignor’s interest and may require an account from the date only of the last account agreed to by all the partners.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 27.

7-12-38.
[Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 27; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 1, effective January 1, 2023; repealed by P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12-39.
Partner’s interest subject to charging order. [Repealed effective January 1, 2023.]

On due application to the superior court by any judgment creditor of a partner, the court may charge the interest of the debtor partner with payment of the unsatisfied amount of the judgment debt with interest on it; and may then or later appoint a receiver of his or her share of the profits, and of any other money due, or to fall due, to him or her in respect of the partnership, and make all other orders, directions, accounts, and inquiries that the debtor partner might have made, or that the circumstances of the case require.

The interest charged may be redeemed at any time before foreclosure, or in case of a sale being directed by the court, may be purchased without causing a dissolution:

With separate property, by any one or more of the partners; or

With partnership property, by any one or more of the partners with the consent of all the partners whose interests are not so charged or sold.

Nothing in §§

7-12-12

—

7-12-55

deprives a partner of his or her right, if any, under the exemption laws, regarding his interest in the partnership.

History of Section.

R.P.L. 1957, ch. 74, § 28.